Maryland, session 2026, HB0768.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0768*

HOUSE BILL 768
Article – Family Law
5–527.1.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “UNMET NEEDS” MEANS NEEDS BEYOND THOSE THAT
THE DEPARTMENT IS REQUIRED OR AGREES TO PAY, INCLUDING:
(1) ADDITIONAL SERVICES, RESOURCES, OR EQUIPMENT RELATED TO
A CHILD’S DISABILITY;
(2) HOUSING EXPENSES IF A CHILD IS PREPARING TO LEAVE THE
CUSTODY OF THE DEPARTMENT FOR REASONS RELATED TO THE CHILD’S AGE;
(3) TECHNOLOGY, SPECIAL CLOTHING, INSTRUMENTS, BOOKS, OR
OTHER ITEMS RELATING TO A CHILD’S HOBBIES AND INTERESTS;
(4) TRANSPORTATION EXPENSES NOT OTHERWISE PAID BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(5) TUITION, TUTORING, OR TRAINING, INCLUDING APPLICATION
FEES, BOOKS, EQUIPMENT, AND TESTING.
(B) This section applies to children committed to the custody of the Department.
[(b) When applying for benefits under this section for a child in the Department’s
custody, the Department shall, in cooperation with the child’s attorney, identify a
representative payee or fiduciary in accordance with the requirements of 20 C.F.R. §§
404.2021 and 416.621.]
(C) IF A CHILD WAS RECEIVING U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
BENEFITS, SUPPLEMENTAL SECURITY INCOME, OR SOCIAL SECURITY BENEFITS
BEFORE ENTERING THE DEPARTMENT’S CUSTODY, OR IF THE DEPARTMENT
APPLIES FOR BENEFITS ON BEHALF OF THE CHILD, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ATTEMPT TO IDENTIFY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE CHILD AND
THE CHILD’S GUARDIAN AD LITEM OR ATTORNEY, AN APPROPRIATE
REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF 20 C.F.R.
§§ 404.2021 AND 416.621;
(2) APPLY TO BECOME THE REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE ONLY IF NO
OTHER SUITABLE CANDIDATE IS AVAILABLE; AND
(3) DOCUMENT ALL EFFORTS TO LOCATE A SUITABLE CANDIDATE.

HOUSE BILL 768 3
(D) THE DEPARTMENT PERIODICALLY SHALL REVIEW WHETHER A PERSON
OTHER THAN THE DEPARTMENT IS AVAILABLE TO APPLY TO ASSUME THE ROLE OF
REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IF THE PERSON
COULD BETTER SERVE THE BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD.
[(c)] (E) (1) Consistent with federal law, when the Department serves as the
representative payee or in any other fiduciary capacity for a child receiving [Veterans
Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS benefits, Supplemental
Security Income, or Social Security benefits, the Department shall:
[(1)] (I) use THE BENEFITS FOR THE CHILD’S CURRENT UNMET
NEEDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITEM (IV)4 OF THIS PARAGRAPH or conserve the benefits
in the child’s best interest, including using the benefits for services for special needs not
otherwise provided by the Department or conserving the benefits for the child’s reasonably
foreseeable future needs;
[(2)] (II) ensure that when the child [attains the age of 14 years] ENTERS
THE CARE OF THE DEPARTMENT and until the Department no longer serves as the
representative payee or fiduciary, [a minimum percentage of] the child’s benefits are not
used to reimburse the State for the costs of care for the child and are used or conserved in
accordance with items [(3) and (4)] (III) AND (IV) of this [subsection, as follows:
(i) from age 14 through age 15, at least 40%;
(ii) from age 16 through age 17, at least 80%; and
(iii) from age 18 through age 20, 100%] PARAGRAPH;
[(3)] (III) for the child’s benefits or resources that are below or not subject
to any federal asset or resource limit, exercise discretion in accordance with federal law and
in the best interest of the child to [conserve the funds or] use the funds for [services for
special needs not otherwise provided by the Department] THE CHILD’S CURRENT UNMET
NEEDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITEM (IV)5 OF THIS PARAGRAPH OR CONSERVE THE
FUNDS, including BY choosing one or more of the options listed under item [(4)] (IV) of this
[subsection] PARAGRAPH;
[(4)] (IV) appropriately monitor any federal asset or resource limits for the
benefits and ensure that the child’s best interest is served by using or conserving the
benefits in a way that avoids violating any federal asset or resource limits that would affect
the child’s eligibility to receive the benefits, including:
[(i)] 1. applying to the Social Security Administration to establish
a Plan for Achieving Self–Support (PASS) account for the child under the Social Security

HOUSE BILL 768
Act and determining whether it is in the best interest of the child to conserve all or part of
the benefits in the PASS account;
[(ii)] 2. establishing a 529A plan for the child and conserving the
child’s benefits in that account in a manner that appropriately avoids any federal asset or
resource limits;
[(iii)] 3. establishing an individual development account for the
child and conserving the child’s benefits in that account in a manner that appropriately
avoids any federal asset or resource limits;
[(iv)] 4. establishing a special needs trust for the child and
conserving the child’s benefits in the trust in a manner that is consistent with federal
requirements for special needs trusts and that appropriately avoids any federal asset or
resource limits;
[(v) if the Department determines that using the benefits for services
for current special needs not already provided by the Department is in the best interests of
the child, using the benefits for those services;]
5. USING THE BENEFITS IN A MANNER THAT IS IN THE
BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD FOR THE CHILD’S CURRENT UNMET NEEDS, AS
DETERMINED IN CONSULTATION WITH THE CHILD AND THE ATTORNEY FOR THE
CHILD, FOR COSTS NOT PAID BY THE DEPARTMENT AS PART OF THE CHILD’S CARE
OR BY THE HEALTH INSURANCE OF THE CHILD;
[(vi)] 6. if federal law requires certain back payments of benefits
to be placed in a dedicated account, complying with the requirements for dedicated accounts
under 20 C.F.R. § 416.640(e); and
[(vii)] 7. applying any other exclusions from federal asset or
resource limits available under federal law and using or conserving the child’s benefits in
a manner that appropriately avoids any federal asset or resource limits;
[(5)] (V) provide an annual accounting to the child and the child’s
attorney of how the child’s resources, including [Veterans Administration] U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS benefits, Supplemental Security Income, and
Social Security benefits, have been used or conserved in accordance with this section; [and]
[(6)] (VI) provide the child with financial literacy training when the child
has attained the age of 14 years; AND
(VII) WHEN THE CHILD HAS ATTAINED THE AGE OF 16 YEARS AND
6 MONTHS, PROVIDE THE CHILD WITH INFORMATION REGARDING:

HOUSE BILL 768 5
1. ACCESSING, USING, AND MAINTAINING BENEFITS;
2. TRANSITION PLANS;
3. WHEN THE BENEFITS ARE SCHEDULED TO END; AND
4. ELIGIBILITY FOR BENEFITS AFTER LEAVING THE
CARE OF THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) (I) A BENEFICIARY WHO IS AT LEAST 18 YEARS OLD MAY
REQUEST THE COURT TO ALLOW THE BENEFICIARY’S BENEFITS TO BE USED FOR
CURRENT UNMET NEEDS.
(II) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT IT IS IN THE BEST
INTEREST OF THE BENEFICIARY TO USE THE BENEFITS FOR CURRENT UNMET
NEEDS, THE COURT SHALL GRANT A REQUEST MADE UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER A CHILD ENTERS THE CARE OF THE
DEPARTMENT, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, DETERMINE THE CHILD’S
ELIGIBILITY FOR U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS BENEFITS,
SUPPLEMENTAL SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME, AND SOCIAL SECURITY BENEFITS;
(2) SEEK COVERAGE FOR THE COST OF THE SCREENING REQUIRED
UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THROUGH THE EARLY AND PERIODIC
SCREENING, DIAGNOSTIC, AND TREATMENT BENEFIT; AND
(3) APPLY FOR BENEFITS ON BEHALF OF THE CHILD, IF THE
DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT A CHILD MIGHT BE ELIGIBLE FOR THE BENEFITS.
[(d)] (G) (1) The Department shall immediately notify the child through the
child’s attorney of:
(i) any application for [Veterans Administration] U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS benefits, Supplemental Security Income, or
Social Security benefits made on the child’s behalf or any application to become
representative payee for those benefits on the child’s behalf;
(ii) any decisions or communications from the [Veterans
Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS or the Social Security
Administration regarding an application for benefits described under item (i) of this
paragraph; and

HOUSE BILL 768
(iii) any appeal or other action requested by the Department
regarding an application for benefits described under item (i) of this paragraph.
(2) IF THE BENEFITS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION
ARE DENIED AND THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES AN APPEAL IS IN THE BEST
INTEREST OF THE CHILD, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH THE CHILD’S
ATTORNEY AND APPEAL THE DENIAL.
(3) When the Department serves as the representative payee or otherwise
receives [Veterans Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
benefits, Supplemental Security Income, or Social Security benefits on the child’s behalf,
the Department shall provide notice to the child through the child’s attorney of the
following before each juvenile court hearing regarding the child:
(i) the dates and the amount of benefit funds received on the child’s
behalf since any prior notification to the child’s attorney; and
(ii) information regarding all the child’s assets and resources,
including the child’s benefits, insurance, cash assets, trust accounts, earnings, and other
resources.
[(e)] (H) This section may not be construed to affect any additional notice
required by a State court.
(a) This section applies to children committed to the custody of the Department.
(b) When applying for benefits under this section for a child in the Department’s
custody, the Department shall, in cooperation with the child’s attorney, identify a
representative payee or fiduciary in accordance with the requirements of 20 C.F.R. §§
404.2021 and 416.621.
(c) Consistent with federal law, when the Department serves as the
representative payee or in any other fiduciary capacity for a child receiving [Veterans
Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS benefits, Supplemental
Security Income, or Social Security benefits, the Department shall:
(1) use or conserve the benefits in the child’s best interest, including using
the benefits for services for special needs not otherwise provided by the Department or
conserving the benefits for the child’s reasonably foreseeable future needs;
(2) ensure that when the child attains the age of 14 years and until the
Department no longer serves as the representative payee or fiduciary, a minimum
percentage of the child’s benefits are not used to reimburse the State for the costs of care
for the child and are used or conserved in accordance with items (3) and (4) of this
subsection, as follows:

HOUSE BILL 768 7
(i) from age 14 through age 15, at least 40%;
(ii) from age 16 through age 17, at least 80%; and
(iii) from age 18 through age 20, 100%;
(3) for the child’s benefits or resources that are below or not subject to any
federal asset or resource limit, exercise discretion in accordance with federal law and in the
best interest of the child to conserve the funds or use the funds for services for special needs
not otherwise provided by the Department, including choosing one or more of the options
listed under item (4) of this subsection;
(4) appropriately monitor any federal asset or resource limits for the
benefits and ensure that the child’s best interest is served by using or conserving the
benefits in a way that avoids violating any federal asset or resource limits that would affect
the child’s eligibility to receive the benefits, including:
(i) applying to the Social Security Administration to establish a
Plan for Achieving Self–Support (PASS) account for the child under the Social Security Act
and determining whether it is in the best interest of the child to conserve all or part of the
benefits in the PASS account;
(ii) establishing a 529A plan for the child and conserving the child’s
benefits in that account in a manner that appropriately avoids any federal asset or resource
limits;
(iii) establishing an individual development account for the child and
conserving the child’s benefits in that account in a manner that appropriately avoids any
federal asset or resource limits;
(iv) establishing a special needs trust for the child and conserving the
child’s benefits in the trust in a manner that is consistent with federal requirements for
special needs trusts and that appropriately avoids any federal asset or resource limits;
(v) if the Department determines that using the benefits for services
for current special needs not already provided by the Department is in the best interests of
the child, using the benefits for those services;
(vi) if federal law requires certain back payments of benefits to be
placed in a dedicated account, complying with the requirements for dedicated accounts
under 20 C.F.R. § 416.640(e); and
(vii) applying any other exclusions from federal asset or resource
limits available under federal law and using or conserving the child’s benefits in a manner
that appropriately avoids any federal asset or resource limits;

HOUSE BILL 768
(5) provide an annual accounting to the child and the child’s attorney of
how the child’s resources, including [Veterans Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AFFAIRS benefits, Supplemental Security Income, and Social Security
benefits, have been used or conserved in accordance with this section; [and]
(6) provide the child with financial literacy training when the child has
attained the age of 14 years; AND
(7) BEGINNING WHEN THE CHILD HAS ATTAINED THE AGE OF 16
YEARS, PROVIDE THE CHILD, IF APPLICABLE, WITH INFORMATION REGARDING:
(I) ACCESSING, USING, AND MAINTAINING BENEFITS;
(II) TRANSITION PLANS;
(III) WHEN THE BENEFITS ARE SCHEDULED TO END; AND
(IV) ELIGIBILITY FOR BENEFITS AFTER LEAVING THE CARE OF
THE DEPARTMENT.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) DETERMINE THE ELIGIBILITY FOR U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AFFAIRS BENEFITS, SUPPLEMENTAL SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME, AND
SOCIAL SECURITY BENEFITS OF A CHILD WHO IS PLACED IN THE CARE AND
CUSTODY OF THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN 60 DAYS:
(I) AFTER THE CHILD ENTERS THE CARE AND CUSTODY OF THE
DEPARTMENT;
(II) AFTER THE DEPARTMENT RECEIVES NOTICE FROM THE
CHILD’S ATTORNEY OF A MATERIAL CHANGE OF CIRCUMSTANCES THAT IS LIKELY
TO AFFECT THE CHILD’S ELIGIBILITY FOR BENEFITS;
(III) AFTER THE CHILD REACHES THE AGE OF 17 YEARS AND 6
MONTHS; AND
(IV) AFTER THE CHILD REACHES THE AGE OF 20 YEARS AND 6
MONTHS;
(2) APPLY FOR BENEFITS ON BEHALF OF THE CHILD, IF THE
DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT A CHILD MIGHT BE ELIGIBLE FOR ANY BENEFITS;
AND

HOUSE BILL 768 9
(3) IF THE DEPARTMENT IS IDENTIFIED AS THE REPRESENTATIVE
PAYEE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, APPLY TO SERVE AS
REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE.
[(d)] (E) (1) The Department shall immediately notify the child through the
child’s attorney of:
(i) any application for [Veterans Administration] U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS benefits, Supplemental Security Income, or
Social Security benefits made on the child’s behalf or any application to become
representative payee for those benefits on the child’s behalf;
(ii) any decisions or communications from the [Veterans
Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS or the Social Security
Administration regarding an application for benefits described under item (i) of this
paragraph; and
(iii) any appeal or other action requested by the Department
regarding an application for benefits described under item (i) of this paragraph.
(2) IF THE BENEFITS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION
ARE DENIED AND THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES AN APPEAL IS IN THE BEST
INTEREST OF THE CHILD, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH THE CHILD’S
ATTORNEY TO DETERMINE WHETHER TO APPEAL THE DENIAL.
(3) When the Department serves as the representative payee or otherwise
receives [Veterans Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
benefits, Supplemental Security Income, or Social Security benefits on the child’s behalf,
the Department shall provide notice to the child through the child’s attorney of the
following before each juvenile court hearing regarding the child:
(i) the dates and the amount of benefit funds received on the child’s
behalf since any prior notification to the child’s attorney; and
(ii) information regarding all the child’s assets and resources,
including the child’s benefits, insurance, cash assets, trust accounts, earnings, and other
resources.
(F) SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF FUNDS, THE SECRETARY SHALL
ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A FOSTER YOUTH SAVINGS PROGRAM TO CONSERVE
ADDITIONAL RESOURCES TO ASSIST YOUTH IN TRANSITIONING TO INDEPENDENCE.
(G) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS AND POLICIES TO
IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 768
[(e)] (H) This section may not be construed to affect any additional notice
required by a State court.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–527.1.
(a) This section applies to children committed to the custody of the Department.
[(b) When applying for benefits under this section for a child in the Department’s
custody, the Department shall, in cooperation with the child’s attorney, identify a
representative payee or fiduciary in accordance with the requirements of 20 C.F.R. §§
404.2021 and 416.621.]
(B) IF A CHILD WAS RECEIVING U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
BENEFITS, SUPPLEMENTAL SECURITY INCOME, OR SOCIAL SECURITY BENEFITS
BEFORE ENTERING THE DEPARTMENT’S CUSTODY, OR IF THE DEPARTMENT
APPLIES FOR BENEFITS ON BEHALF OF THE CHILD, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ATTEMPT TO IDENTIFY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE CHILD’S
ATTORNEY, AN APPROPRIATE REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF 20 C.F.R. §§ 404.2021 AND 416.621;
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT IS IDENTIFIED, APPLY TO BECOME THE
REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE; AND
(3) DOCUMENT ALL EFFORTS TO LOCATE AN APPROPRIATE
REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE.
(C) IF A CHILD IS IN THE CUSTODY OF THE DEPARTMENT AND IS RECEIVING
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS BENEFITS, SUPPLEMENTAL SECURITY
INCOME, OR SOCIAL SECURITY BENEFITS, AFTER A CHANGE TO A CHILD’S
PERMANENCY PLAN, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) REVIEW THE IDENTIFICATION OF THE REPRESENTATIVE PAYEE
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IN CONSULTATION WITH THE CHILD’S
ATTORNEY; AND
(2) IF APPLICABLE, APPLY FOR A CHANGE TO THE REPRESENTATIVE
PAYEE.

HOUSE BILL 768 11
[(c)] (D) Consistent with federal law, when the Department serves as the
representative payee or in any other fiduciary capacity for a child receiving U.S.
Department of Veterans Affairs benefits, Supplemental Security Income, or Social Security
benefits, the Department shall:
(1) CONSERVE ANY FEDERAL BENEFITS RECEIVED ON BEHALF OF
THE CHILD;
(2) [use or] conserve the benefits in the child’s best interest, including
using the benefits for services for special needs not otherwise provided by the Department
or conserving the benefits for the child’s reasonably foreseeable future needs;
[(2) ensure that when the child attains the age of 14 years and until the
Department no longer serves as the representative payee or fiduciary, a minimum
percentage of the child’s benefits are not used to reimburse the State for the costs of care
for the child and are used or conserved in accordance with items (3) and (4) of this
subsection, as follows:
(i) from age 14 through age 15, at least 40%;
(ii) from age 16 through age 17, at least 80%; and
(iii) from age 18 through age 20, 100%;]
(3) for the child’s benefits or resources that are below or not subject to any
federal asset or resource limit, exercise discretion in accordance with federal law and in the
best interest of the child to [conserve the funds or] use the funds [for services for special
needs not otherwise provided by the Department] OR CONSERVE THE FUNDS, including
BY choosing one or more of the options listed under item (4) of this subsection;
(4) appropriately monitor any federal asset or resource limits for the
benefits and ensure that the child’s best interest is served by using or conserving the
benefits in a way that avoids violating any federal asset or resource limits that would affect
the child’s eligibility to receive the benefits, including:
(i) applying to the Social Security Administration to establish a
Plan for Achieving Self–Support (PASS) account for the child under the Social Security Act
and determining whether it is in the best interest of the child to conserve all or part of the
benefits in the PASS account;
(ii) establishing a 529A plan for the child and conserving the child’s
benefits in that account in a manner that appropriately avoids any federal asset or resource
limits;

HOUSE BILL 768
(iii) establishing an individual development account for the child and
conserving the child’s benefits in that account in a manner that appropriately avoids any
federal asset or resource limits;
(iv) establishing a special needs trust for the child and conserving the
child’s benefits in the trust in a manner that is consistent with federal requirements for
special needs trusts and that appropriately avoids any federal asset or resource limits;
(v) if the Department determines that using the benefits for services
for current special needs not already provided by the Department is in the best interests of
the child, using the benefits for those services;
(vi) if federal law requires certain back payments of benefits to be
placed in a dedicated account, complying with the requirements for dedicated accounts
under 20 C.F.R. § 416.640(e); and
(vii) applying any other exclusions from federal asset or resource
limits available under federal law and using or conserving the child’s benefits in a manner
that appropriately avoids any federal asset or resource limits;
(5) provide an annual accounting to the child and the child’s attorney of
how the child’s resources, including U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs benefits,
Supplemental Security Income, and Social Security benefits, have been used or conserved
in accordance with this section;
(6) provide the child with financial literacy training when the child has
attained the age of 14 years; and
(7) beginning when the child has attained the age of 16 years, provide the
child, if applicable, with information regarding:
(i) accessing, using, and maintaining benefits;
(ii) transition plans;
(iii) when the benefits are scheduled to end; and
(iv) eligibility for benefits after leaving the care of the Department.
[(d)] (E) The Department shall:
(1) determine the eligibility for U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs
benefits, Supplemental Social Security Income, and Social Security benefits of a child who
is placed in the care and custody of the Department within 60 days:
(i) after the child enters the care and custody of the Department;

HOUSE BILL 768 13
(ii) after the Department receives notice from the child’s attorney of
a material change of circumstances that is likely to affect the child’s eligibility for benefits;
(iii) after the child reaches the age of 17 years and 6 months; and
(iv) after the child reaches the age of 20 years and 6 months;
(2) apply for benefits on behalf of the child, if the Department determines
that a child might be eligible for any benefits; and
(3) if the Department is identified as the representative payee under
subsection (b) of this section, apply to serve as representative payee.
[(e)] (F) (1) The Department shall immediately notify the child through the
child’s attorney of:
(i) any application for U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs benefits,
Supplemental Security Income, or Social Security benefits made on the child’s behalf or any
application to become representative payee for those benefits on the child’s behalf;
(ii) any decisions or communications from the U.S. Department of
Veterans Affairs or the Social Security Administration regarding an application for benefits
described under item (i) of this paragraph; and
(iii) any appeal or other action requested by the Department
regarding an application for benefits described under item (i) of this paragraph.
(2) If the benefits under paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection are denied and
the Department determines an appeal is in the best interest of the child, the Department
shall consult with the child’s attorney to determine whether to appeal the denial.
(3) When the Department serves as the representative payee or otherwise
receives U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs benefits, Supplemental Security Income, or
Social Security benefits on the child’s behalf, the Department shall provide notice to the
child through the child’s attorney of the following before each juvenile court hearing
regarding the child:
(i) the dates and the amount of benefit funds received on the child’s
behalf since any prior notification to the child’s attorney; and
(ii) information regarding all the child’s assets and resources,
including the child’s benefits, insurance, cash assets, trust accounts, earnings, and other
resources.
[(f)] (G) Subject to the availability of funds, the Secretary shall establish and
maintain a foster youth savings program to conserve additional resources to assist youth
in transitioning to independence.

HOUSE BILL 768
[(g)] (H) The Secretary shall adopt regulations and policies to implement the
provisions of this section.
[(h)] (I) This section may not be construed to affect any additional notice
required by a State court.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026. Section 1 of this Act shall
remain effective for a period of 9 months and, at the end of June 30, 2027, Section 1 of this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.